Utah statutes.
23-15-13.   Operation of aquaculture and fee fishing facilities.
A person may engage in the following activities as provided by Title 4,
Chapter 37, Aquaculture Act, and rules adopted under that chapter by the
Department of Agriculture and Food and Wildlife Board:
(1)  acquisition, importation, or possession of aquatic animals intended for
use in an aquaculture or fee fishing facility;
(2)  transportation of aquatic animals to or from an aquaculture facility or
to a fee fishing facility;
(3)  stocking or propagation of aquatic animals in an aquaculture or fee
fishing facility; and
(4)  harvest, transfer, or sale of aquatic animals from an aquaculture or fee
fishing facility.
